Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3418
Beneficiary; liability for medicaid
reimbursement; liability for creditor claims and statutory allowances; limit.

A beneficiary
to whom an interest is transferred by a transfer on death deed shall be personally
liable to account for medicaid reimbursement pursuant to sections 68-919 and
76-3417 to the extent necessary to discharge any such claim remaining unpaid
after application of the assets of the transferor's estate. Such liability
shall be limited to the value of the interest transferred to the beneficiary.
The right to recover applies to medical assistance provided before, at the
same time as, or after the signing of and the recording of the transfer on
death deed.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 18.
January 1, 2013